src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 236K2
 +Inf:%>jee # ;
 +Inf:%>jea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>jeer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jeas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>jeande # ;
 +Imp:%>je # ;

LEXICON 236KL
 +Inf:%>jee # ;
 +Inf:%>jea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>jeer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>jeast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>jeande # ;
 +Imp:%>je # ;

LEXICON 237
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 237K1
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 237K2
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 237KL
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 238
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 238K1
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>e # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 238K2
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>eas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 238KL
 +Inf:%>ee # ;
 +Inf:%>ea # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>eer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>east # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>eande # ;
 +Imp:%>e # ;

LEXICON 241
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>i # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>iast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;

LEXICON 241K1
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>i # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ias # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;

LEXICON 241K2
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ier # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ias # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;

LEXICON 241KL
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ier # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>iast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;

LEXICON 242
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>i # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>iast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;

LEXICON 242K1
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>i # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ias # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;

LEXICON 242K2
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ier # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>ias # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;

LEXICON 242KL
 +Inf:%>ie # ;
 +Inf:%>ia # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ier # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>iast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>ie # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>ien # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>ii # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>ine # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>ine # ;
 +Adj:%>iande # ;
 +Imp:%>i # ;

LEXICON 243
 +Inf:%>øe # ;
 +Inf:%>øa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ø # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>øast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>øande # ;
 +Imp:%>ø # ;

LEXICON 243K1
 +Inf:%>øe # ;
 +Inf:%>øa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ø # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>øas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>øande # ;
 +Imp:%>ø # ;

LEXICON 243K2
 +Inf:%>øe # ;
 +Inf:%>øa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>øer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>øas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>øande # ;
 +Imp:%>ø # ;

LEXICON 243KL
 +Inf:%>øe # ;
 +Inf:%>øa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>øer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>øast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>øande # ;
 +Imp:%>ø # ;

LEXICON 244
 +Inf:%>øe # ;
 +Inf:%>øa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ø # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>øast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>øande # ;
 +Imp:%>ø # ;

LEXICON 244K1
 +Inf:%>øe # ;
 +Inf:%>øa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>ø # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>øas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>øande # ;
 +Imp:%>ø # ;

LEXICON 244K2
 +Inf:%>øe # ;
 +Inf:%>øa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>øer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>øas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>øande # ;
 +Imp:%>ø # ;

LEXICON 244KL
 +Inf:%>øe # ;
 +Inf:%>øa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>øer # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>øast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>o # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oe # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>øande # ;
 +Imp:%>ø # ;

LEXICON 245
 +Inf:%>joe # ;
 +Inf:%>joa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>y # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>joast # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>joande # ;
 +Imp:%>jo # ;

LEXICON 245K1
 +Inf:%>joe # ;
 +Inf:%>joa # ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>y # ;
 +Inf+Pass:%>joas # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>au # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Nøyt+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+MF+Ub+Eint:%>oen # ;
 +Adj+Fem+Ub+Eint:%>oi # ;
 +Adj+Bu+Eint:%>one # ;
 +Adj+Fl:%>one # ;
 +Adj:%>joande # ;
 +Imp:%>jo # ;
