src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
breste+V:br 238 ; ! LEMMA_ID=9889
gidde+V:g 242 ; ! LEMMA_ID=30058
gneste+V:gn 238 ; ! LEMMA_ID=31470
knerte+V:kn 238 ; ! LEMMA_ID=48186
kneste+V:kn 238 ; ! LEMMA_ID=48196
kvelve+V:kv 238 ; ! LEMMA_ID=52759
kverve+V:kv 238 ; ! LEMMA_ID=52813
nøgge+V:n 244 ; ! LEMMA_ID=65770
skrøkke+V:skr 244 ; ! LEMMA_ID=84070
skvelpe+V:skv 238 ; ! LEMMA_ID=84770
sløkke+V:sl 244 ; ! LEMMA_ID=85982
snerpe+V:sn 238 ; ! LEMMA_ID=86777
snerte+V:sn 238 ; ! LEMMA_ID=86787
støkke+V:st 244 ; ! LEMMA_ID=91686
svelte+V:sv 238 ; ! LEMMA_ID=92668
sverve+V:sv 238 ; ! LEMMA_ID=92727
søkke+V:s 244 ; ! LEMMA_ID=93690
velte+V:v 238 ; ! LEMMA_ID=109157
verpe+V:v 238 ; ! LEMMA_ID=110275
